Massachusetts, session 194th, H4660.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
SECTION 1. Notwithstanding section 5A of chapter 3 of the General Laws, section 20 of
chapter 6C of the General Laws, section 7E of chapter 81 of the General Laws or any other
general or special law to the contrary, the secretary of transportation, or a designee, may convey
to the town of Norton for redevelopment purposes through a release deed certain parcels of land
in the town of Norton, owned by the Massachusetts Department of Transportation and taken for
highway purposes pursuant to an order of taking dated May 16, 1973 and recorded with the
Bristol northern district registry of deeds in book 1635, page 64.
The land to be conveyed pursuant to this act is identified as: (i) a portion of Parcel ID 11-
16 to be determined by the secretary of transportation or a designee; (ii) Parcel ID 11-14-01; and
(iii) Parcel ID 11-15, all on the town of Norton assessor’s records and in an order of taking dated
May 16, 1973, recorded in the Bristol northern district registry of deeds in book 1635, page 64
of 2

and as shown on a plan of land dated May 16, 1973 in plan book 139, page16 recorded in said
registry of deeds. Prior to finalizing the transaction or making the conveyance authorized in this
act, the Massachusetts Department of Transportation shall determine the exact boundaries of the
parcels following completion of a survey.
SECTION 2. The consideration for the conveyance authorized in this act shall be the full
and fair market value of the parcel as determined by the Massachusetts Department of
Transportation’s office of real estate and economic development. The parcels shall be conveyed
in its present condition, as is, where is and with all faults, through the Massachusetts Department
of Transportation’s standard form release deed. The town of Norton may sell or lease the parcels
described in section 1 for redevelopment. Upon the town of Norton selling or leasing any portion
of the parcels, the proceeds from such sale or lease shall be conveyed to the commonwealth to
meet the full and fair market value of such parcels.
SECTION 3. Notwithstanding any general or special law to the contrary, the purchaser of
the land shall be responsible for all costs and expenses associated with the conveyance
authorized in this act including, but not limited to, all costs associated with any engineering,
surveys, appraisals and deed preparation as such costs may be determined by the secretary of the
Massachusetts Department of Transportation.
of 2